Utah statutes.
73-4-19.   Redetermination -- Bond of applicant.

Wherever a general determination of water rights upon any river system or water source has been made by the district court, any claimant to the use of water from such river system or water source seeking a redetermination of water rights upon such river system or water source shall, before commencing any action for such redetermination or for the revision of any final judgment other than as provided in Section 73-4-1, furnish to the court in which such action is commenced and before the filing of any petition or complaint for such purpose, a good and sufficient bond, in a form and with sureties approved by the court, in a sum fixed by the court at least equal to twice the estimated costs which may arise in such action, conditioned that if final judgment after hearing, or after appeal should appeal be taken, is awarded against such claimant, then such claimant will pay all costs arising in such action and all damages to other parties thereto arising therefrom.



No Change Since 1953

